Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Transfer and Transporting of Prisoners

441.505.
Fiscal court to provide for transportation of prisoners — Security requirements.

The fiscal court of each county shall provide for the transportation of prisoners as necessary from the jail budget. All vehicles used for the purpose of transporting prisoners shall be equipped with security screens and two (2) way radios.

The fiscal court shall not be required to provide for the transportation of prisoners on work release.

The fiscal court shall not be responsible for providing transportation to prisoners being held out of the county at the time of their release.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 141, § 9, effective July 13, 1984.

441.510.
Transporting to and from detention facility.

If an inmate is confined in a detention facility, he shall be transported as necessary in accordance with the following provisions:

If he is lodged in an urban-county facility in the county where the trial is to be held, the jailer shall carry out this duty; and

In all other cases, the sheriff of the county where the prisoner is incarcerated shall carry out this duty as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

The transportation of any inmate housed in a county detention center whose court appearance is necessary in any other county shall be transported by the sheriff of the county where the trial or court proceedings are to be held.

If an accused is sentenced to confinement, the sheriff shall deliver him to the proper detention facility, with the exception that in the case of a sentence to an urban-county detention facility, the jailer shall carry out this duty.

In each county where there is no jail, the fiscal court or the legislative body of a charter county government, as appropriate, shall adopt a transportation plan which establishes the party responsible for transporting prisoners as necessary:

The fiscal court or the legislative body of a charter county government, as appropriate, may require the jailer to serve as transportation officer to be responsible for transporting prisoners as necessary; or

The fiscal court or the legislative body of a charter county government, as appropriate, may require the sheriff to serve as transportation officer to be responsible for transporting prisoners as necessary; or

The fiscal court or the legislative body of a charter county government, as appropriate, may adopt any reasonable transportation plan so long as the party responsible for transporting prisoners is specified.

Upon the recommendation of the jailer, the fiscal court shall employ a female transportation officer for purposes of assisting the jailer during the transportation of female prisoners, when deemed necessary by the jailer.

In any county where there is no jail and the jailer does not transport prisoners, the jailer shall serve as a bailiff to the Circuit and District Courts of the county as provided for in KRS

71.050

.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the jailer from transporting the prisoners as he or she deems necessary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 55, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 385, § 47, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 141, § 10, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 89, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 384, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 97, § 1, effective June 21, 2001.

441.520.
Transfer of prisoners to secure jail — Circuit Judge may order — Agreement between originating jail and receiving jail — Restrictions on receiving jail — Transport by sheriff — Review of transfer order by Circuit Judge.

As used in this section:

“Originating jail” means a jail that has been ordered by the court to transfer prisoners to a receiving jail; and

“Receiving jail” means a jail that has been ordered by the court to receive prisoners from an originating jail.

If there is danger or probable danger that any or all prisoners confined in a jail will be removed from the jail by violence, the Circuit Judge shall order the transfer of those prisoners to the jail of the nearest county in which the jail is secure and the prisoners can be safely kept. The order shall include evidence of the danger or probable danger to the prisoners. When any such order is made, and a copy is given to the jailer of the receiving jail, he or she shall receive all such prisoners. If a Circuit Judge is not in the county, the order of transfer may be made by a District Judge, who shall deliver the order, or a copy thereof, to the circuit clerk for revision by the Circuit Court.

Except as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, before ordering the transfer of a prisoner from an originating jail to a receiving jail, a Circuit Judge shall receive a written agreement between the originating and receiving jails. The written agreement shall specify that the receiving jail has agreed to house the prisoner or prisoners and that the originating jail shall pay the prisoner’s expenses in accordance with subsection (3)(a) and (b) of this section. If the Circuit Judge orders the transfer before receiving the written agreement, the receiving jail shall not be required to house the prisoner nor shall the receiving jail’s jailer be subject to contempt for failing to obey the transfer order.

In the event a prisoner is transferred from an originating jail to a receiving jail, the receiving jail shall:

Charge no more than three (3) times the per diem amount determined according to KRS 431.215(2). However, the per diem rate charged by the receiving jail shall not exceed the combined cost of the prisoner’s room and board, administrative processing or booking, and any evidence-based programming the prisoner receives;

Perform only medically necessary procedures on the prisoners, as determined by the receiving jail’s medical provider. The originating jail shall be financially responsible for these medically necessary procedures. If a prisoner is sent out of the receiving jail for more than eight (8) hours for a medically necessary procedure, the originating jail shall be financially responsible for all receiving jail personnel costs related to the prisoner’s transportation until the prisoner is returned to the receiving jail; and

Be no more than two (2) geographically contiguous judicial districts away from the originating jail.

The sheriff of the county of the originating jail shall be responsible for the transportation of any prisoners transferred pursuant to this section. For those prisoners transferred pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, the sheriff shall transfer the prisoners in accordance with KRS 441.530(2)(a).

To ensure the ongoing safety and security of the prisoners, any Circuit Judge who orders the transfer of a prisoner from an originating jail to a receiving jail shall review his or her transfer orders every sixty (60) days, with input from the originating and receiving jails.

History.

2238, 2239: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 12, § 3, effective January 1, 1978; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 458, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 385, § 40, effective July 1, 1982; 2020 ch. 109, § 1, effective April 24, 2020.

441.530.
Manner of transfer — Compensation of officers — Computation of expenses.

As used in this section, “receiving jail” means a jail that has been ordered by the court to receive prisoners.

Immediately upon the receipt of a copy of an order made pursuant to KRS 441.520(2)(a), the sheriff, or if there is no sheriff, the coroner, shall transfer the prisoners to the receiving jail. He or she shall deliver the prisoners to the jailer of the receiving jail, with a copy of the order, and take from him or her a receipt for the prisoners, which he or she shall return to the office of the circuit clerk of the county from which the removal was made. The clerk shall file the receipt in his or her office.

The receiving jail shall receive the prisoners and safely keep them until they are properly discharged. If the receiving jail’s jailer fails to accept and keep such prisoners, that jailer and his or her sureties shall be liable in the same manner and to the same extent as if the prisoners had been regularly committed by an order of the Circuit Court of his or her county.

The sheriff conveying the prisoners to the receiving jail, and such guards as the judge directs him or her to take, not exceeding the number of guards allowed in taking convicts to the penitentiary, shall receive the compensation and mileage allowed by KRS

64.070

for taking convicts to the penitentiary. The compensation shall be allowed by the Circuit Judge directing the transfer and paid out of the State Treasury, unless there was no jail in the county or it was rendered insecure by the failure of the fiscal court to keep it in the requisite condition, in which case it shall be paid in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection. The Circuit Judge, in making the allowance, shall state in the order out of which fund it shall be paid. The order of the judge directing the transfer shall be conclusive evidence that the transfer was proper and to the right jail, and shall be a justification to the receiving jail’s jailer for holding any such prisoner in any action against him or her for false imprisonment.

If a transfer of prisoners is necessary because there is no jail in the county or because the jail was rendered insecure by the failure of the fiscal court to keep it in the requisite condition, the cost of lodging the prisoners in the receiving jail shall be borne by the fiscal court of the county from which the transfer was made at a rate set by agreement between the two (2) fiscal courts involved. If the fiscal courts are unable to reach an agreement, the Circuit Judge who ordered the transfer shall establish the rate based on prisoner and facility cost data provided by the receiving jail’s jailer. The order of transfer shall state the reasons of the transfer.

History.

2440: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 385, § 41, effective July 1, 1982; 2020 ch. 109, § 2, effective April 24, 2020.

441.540.
Prisoner transferred to penitentiary when violence threatened — Officer’s compensation.

If there exists threatened violence or intense feeling and public indignation against a person charged with a crime and in the custody of an officer, and the Circuit Judge of the county that has jurisdiction of the offense charged is of the opinion that the person cannot be safely kept in the jail in that county, the Circuit Judge, with the consent of the Governor, may order such person removed for safekeeping to the state penitentiary most convenient to the county having jurisdiction of the offense charged. In the absence of the Circuit Judge from the county, the District Judge of the county may exercise the powers conferred by this section upon the Circuit Judge. The officer who makes the removal shall be entitled to the actual expenses in making the removal, and in addition he shall receive a fee of five dollars ($5) per day for himself and two and one-half dollars ($2.50) per day each for not more than two (2) guards. The claim for fees and expenses shall be presented for approval to the Circuit Court of the county having jurisdiction of the offense. The compensation shall be allowed by the Circuit or District Judge directing the transfer and paid out of the treasury of the responsible unit of government.

History.

2240a-1: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 12, § 4, effective January 1, 1978; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 459, effective January 2, 1978.

441.550.
Expense of keeping and dieting prisoner transferred to penitentiary or reformatory — Who pays.

The expense of keeping and dieting a prisoner transferred to the penitentiary or reformatory pursuant to KRS

441.540

shall be borne by the unit of government.

The unit of government shall pay the expenses directly to the Department of Corrections.

“Expenses” shall mean the fee set by the Department of Corrections.

History.

2240a-2: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 12, § 5, effective January 1, 1978; 1982, ch. 385, § 42, effective July 1, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 127, effective July 14, 1992.

441.560.
Transfer of prisoners for medical treatment.

When a prisoner in a jail, regional jail, or holdover is injured, is or becomes sick or ill, or requires specialized medical care or long-term medical care which is not available at the local jail, the jailer or other person in charge of the jail, regional jail, or holdover may request that the commissioner of the department, or the commissioner’s designee in writing, transfer the prisoner to a facility operated by the department or under contract to the department for the provision of necessary medical treatment and care.

The commissioner, or the commissioner’s designee in writing, may authorize the transfer of the prisoner to a facility operated by the department or under contract to the department for the length of time necessary to secure medical treatment and care for the prisoner. Following medical care and treatment the prisoner shall be returned to the jail, regional jail, or holdover.

If the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee, in writing, authorizes the transfer of the prisoner to a facility operated by the department or under contract to the department, then the department shall pay:

The costs of transfer to and from the department’s facilities;

The room, board, and related costs for the prisoner while the prisoner is in the custody of the department; and

The costs for medical care, treatment, medicines, and supplies for the prisoner while the prisoner is in the custody of the department.

The department shall have no legal duty to transfer any prisoner to the department for medical treatment and care. The decision of the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee, in writing, whether or not to accept a prisoner for transfer to the department shall be subject to appeal to the secretary of justice and public safety.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations relating to the transfer of prisoners to the department for medical treatment and care.

When a prisoner is transferred to the department for medical care and treatment, the jailer or other person in charge of the jail, regional jail, or holdover shall notify the following persons of the reason for the transfer, the fact of the transfer, and the general reasons for the transfer:

The prisoner’s next of kin;

The prisoner’s attorney of record;

The Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney, as appropriate; and

The Chief Circuit Judge or Chief District Judge, as appropriate.

When a prisoner is returned to the jail, regional jail, or holdover by the department, the jailer or other person in charge of the jail, regional jail, or holdover shall notify the persons specified in subsection (6) of this section of the prisoner’s return.

The department’s costs of providing care, drugs, medications, travel, and all other expenses authorized by this section shall be a necessary governmental expense.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 128, § 2, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/26/07). 2007 Ky. Acts chs. 24, 47, and 85 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2007 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.